test/src/dict-gt-yamls/N-lex_nijbe_dict-gt-norm.gen.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-dict-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-dict-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-dict-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-dict-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:

  Noun - nijbe: # ok NIJBE
    nijbe+N+Sg+Nom:  nijbe
    nijbe+N+Sg+Gen:  [niijbe, niˊjbe]
    nijbe+N+Sg+Acc:  [niijbe, niˊjbe]
    nijbe+N+Sg+Ill:  niijbán
    nijbe+N+Sg+Loc:  niijbest
    nijbe+N+Sg+Com:  nijbijn
    nijbe+N+Sg+Abe:  niˊjbettáá
    nijbe+N+Ess:  nijben
    nijbe+N+Par:  nijbed
    nijbe+N+Pl+Nom:  [niijbeh, niˊjbeh]
    nijbe+N+Pl+Gen:  [niijbij, niˊjbij]
    nijbe+N+Pl+Acc:  niijbijd
    nijbe+N+Pl+Ill:  nijbijd
    nijbe+N+Pl+Loc:  niijbijn
    nijbe+N+Pl+Com:  niˊjbijguin
    nijbe+N+Pl+Abe:  niˊjbijttáá

  Noun - lijmá: #ML
    lijmá+N+Sg+Nom:  lijmá
    lijmá+N+Sg+Gen:  [liijmá, liˊjmá]
    lijmá+N+Sg+Acc:  [liijmá, liˊjmá]
    lijmá+N+Sg+Ill:  liijmán
    lijmá+N+Sg+Loc:  liijmást
    lijmá+N+Sg+Com:  lijmáin
    lijmá+N+Sg+Abe:  liˊjmáttáá
    lijmá+N+Ess:  lijmán
    lijmá+N+Par:  lijmád
    lijmá+N+Pl+Nom:  [liijmáh, liˊjmáh]
    lijmá+N+Pl+Gen:  [liijmái, liˊjmái]
    lijmá+N+Pl+Acc:  liijmáid
    lijmá+N+Pl+Ill:  lijmáid
    lijmá+N+Pl+Loc:  liijmáin
    lijmá+N+Pl+Com:  liˊjmáiguin
    lijmá+N+Pl+Abe:  liˊjmáittáá

  Noun - sijmá: # REMOVED FROM FADDA TO NIJBE
    sijmá+N+Sg+Nom:  sijmá
    sijmá+N+Sg+Gen:  [siijmá, siˊjmá]
    sijmá+N+Sg+Acc:  [siijmá, siˊjmá]
    sijmá+N+Sg+Ill:  siijmán
    sijmá+N+Sg+Loc:  siijmást
    sijmá+N+Sg+Com:  sijmáin
    sijmá+N+Sg+Abe:  siˊjmáttáá
    sijmá+N+Ess:  sijmán
    sijmá+N+Par:  sijmád
    sijmá+N+Pl+Nom:  [siijmáh, siˊjmáh]
    sijmá+N+Pl+Gen:  [siijmái, siˊjmái]
    sijmá+N+Pl+Acc:  siijmáid
    sijmá+N+Pl+Ill:  sijmáid
    sijmá+N+Pl+Loc:  siijmáin
    sijmá+N+Pl+Com:  siˊjmáiguin
    sijmá+N+Pl+Abe:  siˊjmáittáá

  Noun - hijvá: # REMOVED FROM FADDA TO NIJBE
    hijvá+N+Sg+Nom:  hijvá
    hijvá+N+Sg+Gen:  [hiijvá, hiˊjvá]
    hijvá+N+Sg+Acc:  [hiijvá, hiˊjvá]
    hijvá+N+Sg+Ill:  hiijván
    hijvá+N+Sg+Loc:  hiijvást
    hijvá+N+Sg+Com:  hijváin
    hijvá+N+Sg+Abe:  hiˊjváttáá
    hijvá+N+Ess:  hijván
    hijvá+N+Par:  hijvád
    hijvá+N+Pl+Nom:  [hiijváh, hiˊjváh]
    hijvá+N+Pl+Gen:  [hiijvái, hiˊjvái]
    hijvá+N+Pl+Acc:  hiijváid
    hijvá+N+Pl+Ill:  hijváid
    hijvá+N+Pl+Loc:  hiijváin
    hijvá+N+Pl+Com:  hiˊjváiguin
    hijvá+N+Pl+Abe:  hiˊjváittáá

  Noun - pijgá:
    pijgá+N+Sg+Nom:  pijgá
    pijgá+N+Sg+Gen:  [piijgá, piˊjgá]
    pijgá+N+Sg+Acc:  [piijgá, piˊjgá]
    pijgá+N+Sg+Ill:  piijgán
    pijgá+N+Sg+Loc:  [piijgást, pijgáást]
    pijgá+N+Sg+Com:  pijgáin
    pijgá+N+Sg+Abe:  piˊjgáttáá
    pijgá+N+Ess:  pijgán
    pijgá+N+Par:  pijgád
    pijgá+N+Pl+Nom:  [piijgáh, piˊjgáh]
    pijgá+N+Pl+Gen: [piijgái, piˊjgái]
    pijgá+N+Pl+Acc:  piijgáid
    pijgá+N+Pl+Ill:  pijgáid
    pijgá+N+Pl+Loc:  piijgáin
    pijgá+N+Pl+Com:  piˊjgáiguin
    pijgá+N+Pl+Abe:  piˊjgáittáá

  Noun - káigá: # REMOVED FROM FADDA TO NIJBE
    káigá+N+Sg+Nom:  káigá
    káigá+N+Sg+Gen:  [kááigá, káˊigá]
    káigá+N+Sg+Acc:  [kááigá, káˊigá]
    káigá+N+Sg+Ill:  kááigán
    káigá+N+Sg+Loc:  kááigást
    káigá+N+Sg+Com:  káigáin
    káigá+N+Sg+Abe:  káˊigáttáá
    káigá+N+Ess:  káigán
    káigá+N+Par:  káigád
    káigá+N+Pl+Nom:  kááigáh
    káigá+N+Pl+Gen:  [kááigái, káˊigái]
    káigá+N+Pl+Acc:  kááigáid
    káigá+N+Pl+Ill:  káigáid
    káigá+N+Pl+Loc:  kááigáin
    káigá+N+Pl+Com:  káˊigáiguin
    káigá+N+Pl+Abe:  káˊigáittáá

  Noun - luvdá: # removed from fadda
    luvdá+N+Sg+Nom:  luvdá
    luvdá+N+Sg+Gen:  [luuvdá, luˊvdá]
    luvdá+N+Sg+Acc:  [luuvdá, luˊvdá]
    luvdá+N+Sg+Ill:  luuvdán
    luvdá+N+Sg+Loc:  luuvdást
    luvdá+N+Sg+Com:  luvdáin
    luvdá+N+Sg+Abe:  luˊvdáttáá
    luvdá+N+Ess:  luvdán
    luvdá+N+Par:  luvdád
    luvdá+N+Pl+Nom: [luuvdáh, luˊvdáh]
    luvdá+N+Pl+Gen: [luuvdái, luˊvdái]
    luvdá+N+Pl+Acc:  luuvdáid
    luvdá+N+Pl+Ill:  luvdáid
    luvdá+N+Pl+Loc:  luuvdáin
    luvdá+N+Pl+Com:  luˊvdáiguin
    luvdá+N+Pl+Abe:  luˊvdáittáá
